Vermont, session 2025-2026, H576.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. chapter 18A is added to read:
CHAPTER 18A. AFFIRMING HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND
§ 551. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Gender-affirming health care services” means all supplies, care,
and services of a medical, behavioral health, mental health, surgical,
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 2 of 8
psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, preventative, rehabilitative, or supportive
nature, including medication, designed to support and affirm an individual’s
gender identity.
(B) “Gender-affirming health care services” does not include:
(i) conversion therapy as defined by 18 V.S.A. § 8351; or
(ii) surgical interventions on minors who have variations in their
sex characteristics if they have not personally sought and initiated such
treatment.
(2) “Health care provider” means an individual, partnership,
corporation, facility, or institution licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized
by law to provide professional health care services in this State to an individual
during that individual’s medical care, treatment, or confinement.
(3) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention,
treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health condition, including
counseling, procedures, products, devices, and medications.
(4) “Health information” means any information that relates to the past,
present, or future physician or mental health or condition of an individual; the
provision of health care services to an individual; or the past, present, or future
payment for the provision of health care services to an individual.
(5) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization with tax-exempt
status under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 3 of 8
(6) “Patient-identifiable data” means any information, including health
information, that identifies or may reasonably be used as a basis to identify an
individual patient.
§ 552. AFFIRMING HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND PROGRAM
(a) There is created the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program to
provide monetary awards to pay for and support access to gender-affirming
health care services.
(b) The Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program is authorized to
provide monetary awards directly to:
(1) health care providers who provide or are seeking to provide gender-
affirming health care services in Vermont; and
(2) nonprofit organizations whose missions include increasing access to
gender-affirming health care services in Vermont.
(c) Monetary awards shall be used:
(1) to pay for costs associated with providing and receiving gender-
affirming health care services, including:
(A) support for providers of gender-affirming health care services
and relevant nonprofit organizations in order to increase access to gender-
affirming health care services;
(B) paying for care that would otherwise be uncompensated;
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 4 of 8
(C) addressing the support needs of individuals seeking care; and
(D) reducing disparities in access to gender-affirming health care
services by geography, income, race, disability, age, and other factors;
(2) for capital costs associated with establishing and operating Vermont-
based health care clinics to provide gender-affirming health care services; and
(3) for the costs of medical malpractice liability and general liability
insurance for health care providers involved in providing gender-affirming
health care services.
(d) The unexpended balance in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall
remain available for expenditure in future fiscal years. No sums shall be
expended from the Fund that would cause the Fund to be in a deficit at any
time.
(e) The monetary award process shall not require the collection or retention
of any patient-identifiable data.
(f) The Treasurer may make and enter into contracts, agreements,
memoranda of understanding, partnerships, and other arrangements to
collaborate, cooperate, coordinate, contract, or combine resources with other
governmental entities, including other states and their agencies and
instrumentalities, to pay for gender-affirming health care services through the
Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program or a similar program.
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 5 of 8
(g)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the Office of the
Treasurer, the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Board, or any other State
actor to disclose patient-identifiable data, the identity of health care providers
who provide gender-affirming health care services, or the identity of award
applicants or recipients, including nonprofit organizations, to the federal
government, to the government of another state or instrumentality of a state, or
to any other public or private person for any purpose other than facilitating
monetary awards through the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program or a
similar program for the purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section.
(2) Under no circumstances shall patient-identifiable data, the identity of
health care providers who provide gender-affirming health care services, or the
identity of award applicants or recipients, including nonprofit organizations, be
provided to any person for the purpose of engaging in abusive litigation as
defined in 12 V.S.A. § 7301.
§ 553. AFFIRMING HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND
(a) There is established the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund as a special
fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, to be administered by the
Treasurer. The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds for and support the
administration of the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program established in
this chapter.
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 6 of 8
(b) The Fund may receive State appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds,
and funds from any other public or private source. Monies from the Fund may
be expended for monetary awards and for administrative and related purposes.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5
to the contrary, interest earned by the Fund shall remain in the Fund.
(2) The Treasurer’s annual financial report to the Governor and the
General Assembly shall contain an accounting of the receipts, disbursements,
and earnings of the Fund; provided, however, that disbursement information
shall not be reported in a manner that allows for the identification of any
specific patient, health care provider, or nonprofit organization.
(3) Patient-identifiable data and information relating to the identity of
applicants and award recipients is exempt from public inspection and copying
under the Public Records Act and shall be kept confidential.
§ 554. AFFIRMING HEALTH CARE TRUST FUND BOARD
(a) The Affirming Health Care Trust Fund shall be overseen by the
Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Board, which shall be composed of nine
members as follows:
(1) The State Treasurer or designee, who shall serve as chair.
(2) A member, appointed by the Commissioner of Vermont Health
Access.
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 7 of 8
(3) A member, appointed by the American Civil Liberties Union
Foundation of Vermont, who shall be an individual who has received gender-
affirming health care services.
(4) A member, appointed by the Vermont Medical Society, who shall be
a health care provider with experience providing gender-affirming health care
services to adults.
(5) A member, appointed by the American Academy of Pediatrics
Vermont Chapter, who shall be a health care provider with experience
providing gender-affirming health care services to minors.
(6) Four members, appointed by one or more organizations selected by
the State Treasurer whose missions include increasing access to gender-
affirming health care services in Vermont, who shall be individuals who have
received gender-affirming health care services or who are parents or guardians
who have navigated access to gender-affirming health care services for their
children.
(b) The Board shall adopt policies and procedures for the allocation of
monies from the Fund in accordance with this chapter, including policies and
procedures regarding:
(1) applying for an allocation from the Fund;
(2) determinations of eligibility of a patient, health care provider, or
nonprofit organization to receive an allocation from the Fund;
VT LEG #386261 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.576
2026 Page 8 of 8
(3) determinations of eligibility of a cost or expense for reimbursement
under this chapter;
(4) considerations of need, including financial need;
(5) coordination with any other states or with a national or regional
network created for a similar purpose, including the acceptance of funding
transferred for use by the Affirming Health Care Trust Fund Program;
(6) a schedule for regular meetings; and
(7) a conflict of interest policy to address situations in which Board
members may be affiliated with applicants for or recipients of awards from the
Fund.
(c) The Office of the Treasurer, in consultation with the Agency of Human
Services, shall provide administrative and technical support to the Board.
(d) Members of the Board shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for meetings
of the Board, to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose.
(e) The Chair shall call the first meeting of the Board to occur on or before
August 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386261 v.1